Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-926
Person offering to vote; challenge authorized; procedure.

Any person offering to vote, even though such person is registered, may be challenged as unqualified by any inspector, judge or clerk of election, or registered voter. The judge or clerk of election shall challenge any person offering to vote whom he or she knows or suspects not to be duly qualified. The challenge shall be administered pursuant to sections 32-927 to 32-932 as applicable. The election commissioner or county clerk shall provide written oaths and forms to the inspectors and judges of election for purposes of such sections.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 269.